Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6563SV (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. 2396 Section 1. Section 99B.15, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 e. A prize shall be distributed on the day the prize is won, 3 except that if the winner is not present, notification to the 4 winner shall be made as soon as practical within one year of 5 the prize being awarded . 6